Louisiana, session 2026, SB11.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:102(F)(4)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§102. Employer contributions; determination; state systems
* * *
F.(1) * * *
(4) * * *
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary,
effective for the June 30, 2023, system valuation and beginning July 1, 2024, for any
fiscal year in which the projected aggregate employer contribution rate decreases,
the AFC rate shall increase by the lesser of one-half of the amount of the decrease
in the projected aggregate employer contribution rate determined under this Section
or the amount necessary for the AFC rate to equal two three and one-half percent.
Any increase in the AFC rate shall be permanent. The AFC rate shall not exceed two
three and one-half percent.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act shall be funded with additional employer contributions
in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 11 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.